Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 2. Licenses and Permits.

Sec. 04.11.080.
Types of licenses and permits.

Licenses and permits issued under this title are as follows:

beverage dispensary license;

duplicate beverage dispensary license for additional rooms;

restaurant or eating place license;

club license;

bottling works license;

brewery license;

package store license;

general wholesale license;

wholesale malt beverage and wine license;

distillery license;

common carrier dispensary license;

retail stock sale license;

recreational site license;

pub license;

winery license;

caterer’s permit;

special events permit;

conditional contractor’s permit;

brewpub license;

golf course license;

outdoor recreation lodge license;

destination resort license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For statute providing that a license is a personal privilege, see AS

04.11.660

; for continuation of community liquor licenses, which were deleted from this section in 1995, see § 72, ch. 101, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Sec. 04.11.080.
Types of licenses and permits.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2013; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.090.
Beverage dispensary license.

A beverage dispensary license authorizes the holder to sell or serve on the licensed premises alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises only.

The biennial beverage dispensary license fee is $2,500.

[Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

The area designated as the licensed premises under a beverage dispensary license issued to a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that caters to the traveling public as a substantial part of its business may include the dining room, banquet room, guests’ rooms, and other public areas approved by the board.

A holder of a beverage dispensary license may not maintain upon the licensed premises more than one room in which there is regularly maintained a fixed counter or service bar at which alcoholic beverages are sold or served to members of the public for consumption unless the licensee is issued by the board, after investigation, a duplicate of the original license for each of the rooms. The holder of the beverage dispensary license shall pay to the board with each application for a duplicate license an amount equal to the fee payable for the original beverage dispensary license under (b) of this section. If the licensed premises are located within a municipality, a duplicate beverage dispensary license may not be issued unless approved by the council or assembly, as appropriate.

The area designated as the licensed premises under a beverage dispensary license issued to a bowling alley may include the concourse or lane areas of the bowling alley. Notwithstanding AS

04.16.049

, the board may, upon application, authorize access by persons under 21 years of age to the concourse or lane areas designated part of the bowling alley’s licensed premises during hours when no alcoholic beverages are being sold, served, or consumed.

A holder of a beverage dispensary license issued to a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that caters to the traveling public may stock alcoholic beverages in guest rooms, for sale and consumption in the guest room only, if authorized by the board. Alcoholic beverages stocked under this subsection shall be stocked by an employee who is 21 years of age or older, may not be supplied or resupplied during hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is prohibited as provided under AS

04.16.010(a)

and (d), and shall be stored in a refrigerated unit using a key or combination lock system within the guest room. A key lock system shall be designed to prevent the removal of the key unless the refrigerated unit is locked. Except for the licensee, or an agent or employee of the licensee, a key or combination enabling a person to obtain alcoholic beverages stocked in a guest room may only be provided to a guest who occupies the room and who is 21 years of age or older. The board shall issue a permit to each licensee authorized to stock alcoholic beverages under this subsection and may by regulation impose an administrative fee for the cost of issuing the permit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 1995; am § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The board may not require a restaurant licensee to forfeit his restaurant license upon obtaining a beverage dispensary license for the same premises, but the board may properly demand that the restaurant license be surrendered to the board temporarily, pending its transfer to another purchaser or location. September 27, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.090.
Beverage dispensary license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 1995; am § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.100.
Restaurant or eating place license.

A restaurant or eating place license authorizes a restaurant or eating place to sell beer and wine for consumption only on the licensed premises.

A license may be issued under this section only if the board determines that the premises to be licensed are a bona fide restaurant or eating place.

A license may be issued under this section only if the sale and service of food and alcoholic beverages and any other business conducted on the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is under the sole control of the licensee.

The biennial fee for a restaurant or eating place license is $600.

A license may be renewed under this section only if the licensee provides evidence to the board’s satisfaction that gross receipts from the sale of food upon the licensed premises constitute no less than 50 percent of the gross receipts of the licensed premises for each of the two preceding calendar years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (b) of this section, upon written application and approval of the local governing body, the board may renew a restaurant or eating place license and exempt the licensee from the requirements of (b) of this section if the license was issued under the provisions of this subsection before October 1, 1996. The board may not

renew a license as provided under this subsection if

the renewal would result in more than one exempt restaurant or eating place license for every 10 restaurant or eating place licenses allowed under the provisions of AS

04.11.400(a)(2)

or (3);

the premises would be located in a building having a public entrance within 200 feet of the boundary line of a school or a church building in which religious services are being regularly conducted; for purposes of this subparagraph, the 200-foot prohibition is measured from the outer boundary line of the school or the public entrance of the church building by the shortest pedestrian route to the nearest public entrance of the restaurant or eating place; or

transfer an exempt license issued under this subsection to another person.

A restaurant or eating place licensee

operating under a license issued under (f) of this section shall offer a full-service menu of food items available to the public during all times that beer or wine is served or consumed; the menu must be approved by the board;

may only provide entertainment on the licensed premises between the hours of 3:00 p.m. and 11:00 p.m. unless approved by the director after written request by the licensee for a specific occasion; in this paragraph, “entertainment” includes dancing, karaoke, live performances, or similar activities, but does not include recorded or broadcast performances without live participation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 136 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The board may not require a restaurant licensee to forfeit his restaurant license upon obtaining a beverage dispensary license for the same premises, but the board may properly demand that the restaurant license be surrendered to the board temporarily, pending its transfer to another purchaser or location. September 27, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.100.
Restaurant or eating place license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 136 SLA 1996; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.110.
Club license.

A club license authorizes a club or organization to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption only on the licensed premises.

A club license may only be issued to a club, fraternal organization, patriotic organization, or social organization that has been (1) chartered by a state or national organization for a period of two consecutive years before application for a license under this section; or (2) chartered by a national organization and the national organization has maintained a chartered club or organization within the state for a period of at least 20 years. The organization licensed under this section must be operated for social, recreational, political, benevolent, or athletic purposes and not for profit. A club license may only be issued to an organization if none of the income from the sale of alcoholic beverages is distributed to its members, directors, or officers. Soliciting of public patronage of the club premises except as approved by the board is a violation of this section.

The biennial club license fee is $1,200.

Alcoholic beverages sold under a club license may be purchased only by (1) members of the club and their families, (2) widows or widowers of deceased members who have been accorded club privileges, and (3) military personnel on active duty, and their accompanying spouses, who are extended the privilege by patriotic organizations. Alcoholic beverages may be purchased only in the portion of the club rooms that are part of the licensed premises.

Guests who enter the club premises on the invitation of a member and in the company of the member may be served but not sold alcoholic beverages. A guest must leave the premises immediately upon the departure of the member who extended the invitation to enter.

Alcoholic beverages purchased by a club or organization licensed under this section may not be used or consumed off the licensed premises of the club or organization by any person, including club members and employees unless used or consumed at social, recreational, benevolent, or athletic functions of the club or organization and the use or consumption is approved by the board.

Access by persons under 21 years of age to

a club’s licensed premises is permitted when alcoholic beverages are not present; and

the premises of a patriotic organization licensed as a club under this section is permitted when alcoholic beverages are present, if the person is a guest of a member of the club, or the spouse accompanying a guest, and the guest possesses a valid active duty military or armed forces identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Homeland Security.

In this section, “member” means a holder of paid-up membership entitling the holder to all voting rights and privileges of membership under the constitution or bylaws of the club or organization.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 109 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 17 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 101 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For penalties for violation of this title, see AS

04.16.180

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Central Council of the Tlingit and Haida Indian Tribes of Alaska qualifies for a “club license” under this section, but licensure is conditioned on the receipt of an express, written waiver of the council’s sovereignty in regard to the enforcement of this title and local laws pertaining to alcoholic beverages, which waiver should be reviewed by the Attorney General’s office before the license is issued. December 18, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.110.
Club license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 109 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 17 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 101 SLA 2014; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.115.
Golf course license.

A golf course license authorizes the licensee to sell beer and wine on licensed premises located on a golf course.

A license may be issued only if

an application is approved by the local governing body and the board;

the applicant does not hold a beverage dispensary license or a restaurant or eating place license; this paragraph does not apply to an applicant who holds a beverage dispensary license or a restaurant or eating place license if the license was acquired by transfer from a licensee under AS

04.11.280

.

The biennial license fee is $400. The license fee and application fee must accompany the application for the license. An application must include a drawing of the golf course. A sample minimum food menu must accompany the application.

Food similar to that listed in the sample menu must be available during times when beer and wine are sold, served, and consumed on the licensed premises.

A golf course license may not be transferred or relocated.

In this section,

“golf course” means a course, having at least nine holes and covering at least 2,950 yards, that is open to the public; and

“licensed premises” includes buildings located on the golf course or a vending cart designed to carry beverages or food located on the golf course.

History.

(§ 2 ch 125 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Sec. 04.11.115.
Golf course license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 125 SLA 1998; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.120.
Bottling works license.

A bottling works license authorizes the holder to operate a bottling works where beer and wine may be bottled and sold.

A sale under a bottling works license may be made only to a person licensed under this title and only in quantities of more than five gallons.

The biennial bottling works license fee is $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Sec. 04.11.120.
Bottling works license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1993; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.130.
Brewery license.

A brewery license authorizes the holder to operate a brewery where beer is manufactured and bottled or barreled for sale.

The holder of a brewery license may sell beer in quantities of

not more than five gallons a day to an individual who is present on the licensed premises for consumption off the premises;

more than five gallons a day to a person who is licensed under this title, or in another state or country.

The holder of a brewery license may permit a person to sample small portions of the brewery’s product free of charge unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

.

The biennial brewery license fee is $1,000.

Unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

, a holder of a brewery license may sell not more than 36 ounces a day of the brewery’s product to a person for consumption on the premises if

the brewery does not allow live entertainment, televisions, pool tables, dart games, dancing, electronic or other games, game tables, or other recreational or gaming opportunities on the premises where the consumption occurs;

the brewery does not provide seats at the counter or bar where the product is served; and

the room where the consumption occurs is not open before 9:00 a.m. and serving of the product ends not later than 8:00 p.m.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 157 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 106 SLA 2006)

Sec. 04.11.130.
Brewery license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 157 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 106 SLA 2006; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.135.
Brewpub license.

A brewpub license authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license to

manufacture on premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license not more than 465,000 gallons of beer in a calendar year;

sell beer manufactured on premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license for consumption on the licensed premises or other licensed premises of the beverage dispensary licensee that are also licensed as a beverage dispensary;

sell beer manufactured on the premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license in quantities of not more than five gallons a day to an individual who is present on the licensed premises for consumption off the premises;

provide a small sample of the brewpub’s beer manufactured on the premises free of charge unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

;

sell beer manufactured on the premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license to a person licensed as a wholesaler under AS

04.11.160

; sales under this paragraph may not exceed 37,200 gallons in a calendar year, including sales under (6) of this subsection; and

sell not more than 6,200 gallons in a calendar year of beer manufactured on the premises to a person who is licensed under this title, or in another state or country, if the premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license are located in a community with a population of 75,000 or more.

Except as provided under AS

04.11.360

(10), the brewpub license is not transferable, shall remain the property of the state, and is not subject to any form of alienation.

The biennial brewpub license fee is $500.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the holder of a brewpub license who, under the provisions of AS

04.11.450(b)

, formerly held a brewery license and a restaurant or eating place license and who, under the former brewery license, manufactured beer at a location other than the premises licensed under the former restaurant or eating place license may

manufacture not more than 465,000 gallons of beer in a calendar year on premises other than the premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license;

provide a small sample of the manufactured beer free of charge at the location the beer is manufactured unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

; and

sell the beer authorized to be manufactured under this subsection

on the premises licensed under the beverage dispensary license or other licensed premises of the beverage dispensary licensee that are also licensed as a beverage dispensary;

to a wholesaler licensed under AS

04.11.160

; sales under this subparagraph may not exceed 37,200 gallons in a calendar year, including sales under (D) of this paragraph;

to an individual who is present on the premises described under (A) of this paragraph, or where the beer is manufactured, in quantities of not more than five gallons a day for consumption off the premises; and

to a person licensed under this title, or in another state or country, if the premises where the beer is manufactured are located in a community with a population of 75,000 or more; sales under this subparagraph may not exceed 6,200 gallons in a calendar year.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a brewpub license authorizes the holder of a restaurant or eating place license to (1) manufacture on premises licensed under the restaurant or eating place license not more than 465,000 gallons of beer in a calendar year; (2) sell beer manufactured on premises licensed under the restaurant or eating place license for consumption on the licensed premises; (3) sell beer manufactured on the premises licensed under the restaurant or eating place license in quantities of not more than five gallons a day for consumption off the premises to an individual who is present on the licensed premises; and (4) provide a small sample of the brewpub’s beer manufactured on the premises free of charge unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

. A person who holds a brewpub license under this subsection may not hold more than one brewpub license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 6, 7 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 90 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 2003; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 41 SLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4, 5 ch 106 SLA 2006)

Sec. 04.11.135.
Brewpub license.

History.

[§ 3 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 6, 7 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 90 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 2003; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 41 SLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4, 5 ch 106 SLA 2006; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.140.
Winery license.

A winery license authorizes the holder to operate a winery where wine is manufactured and bottled or barreled for sale.

The holder of a winery license may sell wine in quantities of

not more than five gallons

to an individual who is present on the licensed premises; or

by shipping to an individual if the shipment is not to an area that has prohibited the importation or possession of alcoholic beverages under this chapter or to an area that has limited the importation or possession of alcoholic beverages unless the sale complies with the limitation;

more than five gallons to a person who is licensed under this title, or in another state or country.

The holder of a winery license may permit a person to sample small portions of the wine free of charge unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

.

The biennial winery license fee is $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 157 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 106 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.11.140.
Winery license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 157 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 106 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2007; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.150.
Package store license; permit for delivery to social events.

Except as provided under (g), (i), and (j) of this section, a package store license authorizes the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages to a person present on the licensed premises or to a person known to the licensee who makes a written solicitation to that licensee for shipment. A licensee, agent, or employee may only ship alcoholic beverages to the purchaser. Before commencing the practice of shipping alcoholic beverages, and with each subsequent application to renew the license, a licensee shall notify the board in writing of the licensee’s intention to ship alcoholic beverages in response to a written solicitation. The package store licensee, agent, or employee shall include written information on fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects resulting from a woman consuming alcohol during pregnancy in a shipment of alcoholic beverages sold in response to a written solicitation.

The biennial package store license fee is $1,500.

The holder of a package store license may not sell alcoholic beverages unless any stamps required to be affixed to the package by state or federal law are intact on the packages.

The consumption of alcoholic beverages on premises licensed under this section is prohibited.

The business premises occupied by a holder of a package store license may not be connected by a door, opening, or other means of passage intended for the access of the general public to an adjacent retail business not licensed under this title, unless approved by the board.

When the holder of a package store license is also a holder of a beverage dispensary license and the package store premises are contained within or are adjacent to the premises of the beverage dispensary and the only public entrance to the package store is by a door or other means within the premises of the beverage dispensary, the board shall determine if additional entrances to the package store are necessary for enforcement purposes, to meet health and fire safety standards, or for the convenience of the public.

If a shipment is to an area that has restricted the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2), a package store licensee, agent, or employee may not ship to a purchaser more than 10 and one-half liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons or more of malt beverages in individual containers in a calendar month, or a lower amount of distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages if the municipality or established village has adopted the lower amount by local option under AS

04.11.491(g)

. Before shipping alcohol to a purchaser in a restricted area, a package store licensee, agent, or employee shall consult the database maintained by the board under AS

04.06.095

for any alcoholic beverage shipments made to the purchaser during that calendar month by a package store licensee, agent, or employee. A package store licensee, agent, or employee may not ship an amount of alcoholic beverages to a purchaser in a restricted area that, when added to the amount already shipped, exceeds the amount authorized by this subsection. A package store licensee, agent, or employee shall immediately enter into the database the date and the amount of alcoholic beverages shipped to the purchaser. Failure to enter into the database the date and amount of alcoholic beverages shipped to the purchaser as required by this subsection is a class B misdemeanor.

A package store licensee, agent, or employee may not

divide or combine shipments of alcoholic beverages so as to circumvent the limitation imposed under (g) of this section; or

in response to a written order, ship alcohol to a purchaser at an address other than the address where the purchaser resides or, if the purchaser resides in a municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) for which a community delivery site has been designated under AS

04.11.491(f)

, to an address other than that community delivery site except as provided by AS

04.11.491(f)

(1) and (2).

A package store license authorizes the licensee to deliver not more than two bottles of wine or champagne, not more than two bottles of distilled spirits, or not more than 72 ounces of beer in a gift basket with a floral arrangement to a cruise ship passenger or a hotel guest. The wine, champagne, distilled spirits, or beer for delivery may be purchased from a package store licensee by a florist or gift basket establishment with a state business license that designates the business as a florist or gift basket establishment. The package store licensee shall keep on file a copy of the Alaska business license of a florist or gift basket establishment to which the licensee sells wine, champagne, distilled spirits, or beer for delivery to third persons by the package store. The package store must keep a written record of each delivery made under this subsection for a period of at least one year, including the name of the business purchasing the wine, champagne, distilled spirits, or beer and the name of the person to whom the delivery is made. A delivery under this subsection must be made by the licensee or an employee or agent of the licensee who has completed alcohol server training as required under AS

04.21.025

. The board shall issue a permit to each licensee authorized to deliver wine, champagne, distilled spirits, or beer under this subsection and may by regulation impose an administrative fee for the cost of issuing the permit.

A package store license authorizes the licensee to deliver alcoholic beverages between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. to a responsible adult at the location of a wedding or wedding reception or other social event as defined by regulation of the board. A delivery under this subsection may be made only after a sale by written order received from a person present on the licensed premises who makes payment in full at least 48 hours before the delivery. The written order must include the name and address of the purchaser and the date, time, and address of the delivery, as well as the name and address of the responsible adult who will receive the delivery of alcoholic beverages. A delivery authorized under this subsection must be made by the licensee or an employee or agent of the licensee who has completed alcohol server training as required under AS

04.21.025

. Delivery may only be made to a responsible adult at the delivery address on the written order. The responsible adult must provide identification and proof of age as defined in AS

04.21.050

, and must acknowledge receipt of the alcoholic beverages in writing. The package store licensee shall retain the written order and the responsible adult’s written acknowledgment for at least one year after delivery. The board shall issue a permit to each licensee authorized to deliver alcoholic beverages under this subsection and may by regulation impose an administrative fee for the cost of issuing the permit.

“Business premises” means that part of the licensed premises to which the public has access.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 8, 9 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 7, 8 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (g) and (h) were formerly designated as (h) and (i), respectively.
Relettered in 1994, at which time internal references to the subsections were changed accordingly. Subsections (i) and (j) were enacted as (j) and (k), respectively.
Relettered in 1999, at which time internal references to the subsections were changed accordingly. Subsection (k) was enacted as (g), was relettered as (i) in 1994, and was again relettered as (k) in 1999.

Sec. 04.11.150.
Package store license; permit for delivery to social events.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 8, 9 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 7, 8 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 2010; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.160.
Wholesale licenses.

A general wholesale license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages in the original package, and wine in bulk, in quantities of not less than five gallons. A holder of a general wholesale license may not sell to a person not licensed under this title, except as provided in AS

04.21.040

. A holder of a general wholesale license may not sell alcoholic beverages unless any stamps required to be affixed to the package by state or federal law are intact on the package. A wholesaler must obtain a general wholesale license for each distributing point. The biennial general wholesale license fee is $2,000, payable at the time of making an original application or an application for renewal. In addition, the following annual fees shall be paid by a holder of a general wholesale license:

A wholesale malt beverage and wine license authorizes the holder to sell malt beverages and wine in the original packages in quantities of not less than five gallons. The holder of a wholesale malt beverage and wine license may not sell to a person not licensed under this title except as provided in AS

04.21.040

. The biennial wholesale malt beverage and wine license fee is $400, payable at the time of making an original application or application for renewal. In addition, the following annual fees shall be paid by a holder of a wholesale malt beverage and wine license:

No later than February 28 of each year, the licensee shall file with the board an affidavit showing the total business transacted during the preceding calendar year under the license and the location of the licensed premises at which the business was transacted. At the time of filing the affidavit, the licensee shall pay the additional annual fees accrued under (a) and (b) of this section during the preceding calendar year.

Failure to file an affidavit under (c) of this section or the expiration of a license under AS

04.11.540

does not relieve a licensee from paying the prescribed fees.

A person who applies for issuance or renewal of a license under this section shall file, on forms provided by the board, the following information regarding each product line of alcoholic beverages that the person intends to purchase, offer for sale, or sell: (1) the supplier of the product line; (2) the full and correct brand names in the product line; (3) the name of the distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer of the product line; and (4) a certification by the distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer of the product line that the person is the primary source of supply for the product line. In addition to the fees imposed under (a) and (b) of this section, a person filing under this subsection shall pay a biennial filing fee as follows:

A person licensed under this section shall notify the board within 10 days of a change in a primary source of supply designation required under (e) of this section.

In this section, “total business transacted” means the total value of business transacted by the wholesale business, including the excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

.

Total Business Transacted During Calendar Year Annual Fee over $100,000 and not over $150,000
$
500 over $150,000 and not over $200,000
$ 1,000 over $200,000 and not over $250,000
$ 1,500 over $250,000 and not over $300,000
$ 2,000 over $300,000 and not over $350,000
$ 2,500 over $350,000 and not over $400,000
$ 3,000 over $400,000 and not over $500,000
$ 4,000 over $500,000 and not over $600,000
$ 5,000 over $600,000 and not over $700,000
$ 6,000 over $700,000 and not over $800,000
$ 7,000 over $800,000 and not over $1,000,000
$ 9,000 over $1,000,000 $10,000.

Click to view

Total Business Transacted During Calendar Year Annual Fee over $20,000 and not over $50,000
$
300 over $50,000 and not over $100,000
$ 1,000 over $100,000 and not over $150,000
$ 1,500 over $150,000 and not over $200,000
$ 2,000 over $200,000 and not over $400,000
$ 4,000 over $400,000 and not over $600,000
$ 6,000 over $600,000 and not over $800,000
$ 8,000 over $800,000
$10,000.

Click to view

1 to 25 suppliers $
500 26 to 50 suppliers $1,000 51 to 75 suppliers $1,500 over 75 suppliers $2,000

Click to view

In this subsection, “distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer” includes an exclusive agent of the distiller, brewer, vintner, or importer if the agent’s name appears on the label of the brand approved by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 10 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986.

Subsections (e) and (f) were enacted as (f) and (g), respectively. Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (g) and a cross-reference in subsection (f) was changed to reflect the relettering.

Administrative Code. —

For enforcement, see 13 AAC 104, art. 5.

Sec. 04.11.160.
Wholesale licenses.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 85 SLA 1988; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 10 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2014; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.11.170.
Distillery license.

A distillery license authorizes the holder to operate a distillery where alcoholic beverages are distilled and bottled or barreled for sale.

A distillery license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages in

quantities of not more than one gallon a day to a person who is present on the licensed premises for consumption off the premises;

any amount to a person who is licensed under this title or in another state or country.

The biennial distillery license fee is $1,000.

The holder of a distillery license may permit a person to sample small portions of the distillery’s product free of charge unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

.

Unless prohibited by AS

04.16.030

, a holder of a distillery license may sell not more than three ounces a day of the distillery’s product to a person for consumption on the premises if

the distillery does not allow live entertainment, televisions, pool tables, dart games, dancing, electronic or other games, game tables, or other recreational or gaming opportunities on the premises where the consumption occurs;

the distillery does not provide seats at the counter or bar where the product is served; and

the room where the consumption occurs is not open before 9:00 a.m. and serving of the product ends not later than 8:00 p.m.

The holder of a distillery license may combine the distillery’s product under (d) and (e) of this section with other ingredients, including mixers, liquids, or garnishes, that are not alcoholic beverages.

In this section, “distillery’s product” means an alcoholic beverage distilled on the licensed premises.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 82 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of subsections (f) and (g), see sec. 12(a), ch. 59, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (f) and (g).

Sec. 04.11.170.
Distillery license.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 82 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2018; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]